Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.240

Linked deposit program—Compilation of information—Notification regarding enterprises no longer certified—Monitoring loans.

(1) The office shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and the department of commerce, compile information on minority and women's business enterprises that have received financial assistance through a qualified public depositary under the provisions of RCW 43.86A.060. The information shall include, but is not limited to:

(a) Name of the qualified public depositary;

(b) Geographic location of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(c) Name of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(d) Date of last certification by the office and certification number;

(e) Type of business;

(f) Amount and term of the loan to the minority or women's business enterprise; and

(g) Other information the office deems necessary for the implementation of this section.

(2) The office shall notify the state treasurer of minority or women's business enterprises that are no longer certified under the provisions of this chapter. The written notification shall contain information regarding the reason for the decertification and information on financing provided to the minority or women's business enterprise under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3) The office shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and the department of commerce, monitor the performance of loans made to minority and women-owned business enterprises under RCW 43.86A.060.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2025; 2005 c 302 s 5; 2002 c 305 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Intent—2005 c 302: See note following RCW 43.86A.030.